Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1186.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 634b. (1) If a vacancy occurs in the office of state senator or representative and the governor directs that the vacancy be filled at a special election in that senatorial or representative district, and that special election is held on a date other than a regular election date, this state shall reimburse each county, city, or township for the cost of conducting the special election. The reimbursement must not exceed the verified account of actual costs of the special election as provided in this section. (2) Payment must be made upon presentation and approval of a verified account of actual costs to the department of treasury after the department of treasury and the secretary of state agree as to what constitutes valid costs of conducting a special election. Reimbursable costs do not include salaries of permanent local officials or the cost of reusable supplies and equipment. (3) The legislature shall appropriate from the general fund of this state an amount necessary to implement this section. (4) To qualify for reimbursement, a county, city, or township must submit its verified account of actual costs to the department of treasury not later than 90 days after the date of the special election. This state shall pay or disapprove all or a portion of the verified account not later than 90 days after the department of treasury receives a verified account of actual costs under this subsection. (5) If this state disapproves all or a portion of a verified account of actual costs under subsection (4), this state shall send a notice of disapproval along with the reasons for the disapproval to the county, city, or township. Upon request of a county, city, or township whose verified account or portion of a verified account was disapproved under this section, this state shall review the disapproved costs with the county, city, or township.